Hawaii, session 2026, GM1156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. The legislature finds that Hawaii has a strong,
2 historic commitment to civil rights. The legislature further
3 finds that the extension to the statute of limitations provided
4 by this Act would ensure that individuals in Hawaii have greater
5 access to civil-rights protections that reflect the community
6 values of the State: fairness, dignity, and inclusion. The
7 legislature also finds that this extension provides individuals
8 with a more reasonable timeframe to recognize, report, and seek
9 redress for unlawful discrimination under Hawaii state law.
10 The purpose of this Act is to extend the statute of
11 limitations for filing complaints with the Hawaii civil rights
12 commission to one year.
13 SECTION 2. Section 368-11, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
14 amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows:
15 "(c) No complaint shall be filed after the expiration of
16 [one -hundred eighty dayo] one year after the date:
2026-2444 SB2727 CDl SMA.docx 1
lilllilMilllllllHIIIHIIinii

Page 2
S.B. NO.
1 (1) Upon which the alleged unlawful discriminatory
2 practice occurred; or
3 (2) Of the last occurrence in a pattern of ongoing
4 discriminatory practice."
5 SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
6 and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
7 SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2444 SB2727 CDl SMA.docx 2
ISlillillllllllllllliiDIIIB

2727
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 28th day of May ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B.No. 2727, H.D. 1,C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: April 30, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
President of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate
7-26

SB No. 2727, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives